Montana, session 2025, HB821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Article XIV, section 9, of The Constitution of the State of Montana is amended to read:
"Section 9. Amendment by initiative. (1) The people may also propose constitutional amendments
by initiative. Petitions including the full text of the proposed amendment shall be signed by at least ten percent
of the qualified electors of the state. That number shall include at least ten percent of the qualified electors in
each of two-fifths of the legislative districts.
(2) The petitions shall be filed with the secretary of state. If the petitions are found to have been
signed by the required number of electors, the secretary of state shall cause the amendment to be published as
provided by law twice each month for two months previous to the next regular state-wide election.
(3) At that election, the proposed amendment shall be submitted to the qualified electors for
approval or rejection. If approved by a majority three-fifths of the electors voting thereon, it shall become a part
of the constitution effective the first day of July following its approval, unless the amendment provides
otherwise."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 9, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 821

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 821.1
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
[] YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
[] NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 821